Illinois, session 104th, HB3473.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Video Gaming Act is amended by changing 5Section 35 and by adding Section 76 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 40/35)7    Sec. 35. Display of license; confiscation; violation as 8felony. 9    (a) Each video gaming terminal shall be licensed by the 10Board before placement or operation on the premises of a 11licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 12licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 13establishment, or licensed veterans establishment. The license 14of each video gaming terminal shall be maintained at the 15location where the video gaming terminal is operated. Failure 16to do so is a petty offense with a fine not to exceed $100. Any 17licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 18licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 19establishment, or licensed veterans establishment used for the 20conduct of gambling games in violation of this Act shall be 21considered a gambling place in violation of Section 28-3 of 22the Criminal Code of 2012. Every gambling device found in a 23licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment,   HB3473- 2 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 2establishment, or licensed veterans establishment operating 3gambling games in violation of this Act shall be subject to 4seizure, confiscation, and destruction as provided in Section 528-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012. Any license issued under the 6Liquor Control Act of 1934 to any owner or operator of a 7licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 8licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 9establishment, or licensed veterans establishment that 10operates or permits the operation of a video gaming terminal 11within its establishment in violation of this Act shall be 12immediately revoked. No person may own, operate, have in his 13or her possession or custody or under his or her control, or 14permit to be kept in any place under his or her possession or 15control, any device that awards credits and contains a 16circuit, meter, or switch capable of removing and recording 17the removal of credits when the award of credits is dependent 18upon chance. 19    Nothing in this Section shall be deemed to prohibit the 20use of a game device only if the game device is used in an 21activity that is not gambling under subsection (b) of Section 2228-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. An applicant or licensee 23under this Act is not in violation of this Act or any of the 24Board rules under 11 Ill. Adm. Code 1800.420 and shall not be 25subject to disciplinary action, delay of any Board 26consideration, or denial of any license for operating a gaming   HB3473- 3 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1device if operation of the gaming device is in compliance 2with, and not considered gambling under, subsection (b) of 3Section 28-1 or item (iii) of subsection (a) of Section 28-2 of 4the Criminal Code of 2012. 5    A violation of this Section is a Class 4 felony. All 6devices that are owned, operated, or possessed in violation of 7this Section are hereby declared to be public nuisances and 8shall be subject to seizure, confiscation, and destruction as 9provided in Section 28-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 10    The provisions of this Section do not apply to devices or 11electronic video game terminals licensed pursuant to this Act. 12A video gaming terminal operated for amusement only and 13bearing a valid amusement tax sticker shall not be subject to 14this Section until 30 days after the Board establishes that 15the central communications system is functional. 16    (b) (1) The odds of winning each video game shall be posted 17on or near each video gaming terminal. The manner in which the 18odds are calculated and how they are posted shall be 19determined by the Board by rule.20    (2) No video gaming terminal licensed under this Act may 21be played except during the legal hours of operation allowed 22for the consumption of alcoholic beverages at the licensed 23establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, or licensed 24veterans establishment. A licensed establishment, licensed 25fraternal establishment, or licensed veterans establishment 26that violates this subsection is subject to termination of its   HB3473- 4 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1license by the Board. 2(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 3    (230 ILCS 40/76 new)4    Sec. 76. Gaming Disparity Task Force.5    (a) The Gaming Disparity Task Force is created. The 6Governor shall appoint 5 members, including the Chair. The 7Chair shall set the agenda and staff the Task Force and take 8all other actions necessary to complete the mission of 9identifying disparities in the video gambling industry.10    (b) The Task Force may:11        (1) maintain a staff;12        (2) make recommendations for policy, statute, and rule 13    changes;14        (3) collect data both in Illinois and outside Illinois 15    regarding the regulation of gaming and quasi-gaming, 16    including requiring terminal operators to submit detailed 17    information regarding ownership, revenues, and moneys 18    spent on goods and services and any other information 19    deemed necessary to identify disparities in gaming and 20    lack of minority business enterprise participation;21        (4) compile or assist in the compilation of any 22    reports required by this Act;23        (5) ensure the coordination of efforts between various 24    State agencies involved in regulating and taxing gaming or 25    quasi-gaming in Illinois; and  HB3473- 5 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1        (6) encourage, promote, suggest, and report best 2    practices for ensuring diversity in the gaming and 3    quasi-gaming industry in Illinois.4    (c) Any funding required for the Task Force, its staff, or 5its activities shall be drawn from a fee determined by the Task 6Force and collected by the Board to be paid by terminal 7operators that generate at least $5,000,000 of net terminal 8income in any given month.9    (d) The Task Force shall commission and publish an annual 10disparity and availability study that: (1) evaluates whether 11there exists discrimination in the State's gaming industry; 12and (2) if so, evaluates the impact of such discrimination on 13the State and includes recommendations to the Board for 14reducing or eliminating any identified barriers to entry in 15the video gaming market.16    The Task Force may compile, collect, or otherwise gather 17data necessary for the administration of this Section and to 18carry out the Task Force's duty relating to the recommendation 19of policy changes.20    (e) The Task Force shall hold public meetings and issue 21subpoenas, if necessary, for testimony.22    (f) The Task Force shall submit a copy of the annual study 23to the General Assembly no later than February 1 of each year 24in the manner provided for reports to the General Assembly 25under Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act.26    (g) From any fees collected under subsection (c), the Task   HB3473- 6 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1Force shall set aside payment to a minority business 2enterprise-owned terminal operator as provided in this 3subsection. The Task Force shall direct the Board to approve a 4minority business enterprise-owned terminal operator to 5receive the payment as a licensee or person of significant 6control. Payment to the minority business enterprise shall 7commence upon the filing of forms with the Board as designated 8by the Board. The Task Force shall calculate the percentage of 9the fees collected under subsection (c) that shall be set 10aside to pay to the minority business enterprise-owned 11terminal operation by calculating the percentage of Illinois' 12population of the minority group or minority groups of which 13the minority person or persons who own the terminal operation 14are part. As used in this subsection, "minority person" has 15the meaning given to that term in Section 8.12 of the Business 16Corporation Act of 1983.17    (h) The Task Force shall establish a process for the 18sunset of devices exempted under paragraph (13) of subsection 19(b) of Section 28-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012 and Section 35 20of this Act. The Task Force shall consider such factors deemed 21reasonably necessary to rectify disparities in gaming when 22developing the sunset process. The Task Force shall include, 23at a minimum, in the sunset process: the authorization of 24video gambling in any municipality with a population more than 252,000,000 people; the opportunity for all statutorily eligible 26establishments in any municipality with a population more than   HB3473- 7 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b12,000,000 people to apply for a video gaming license; 2consideration and determination by the Board of all 3statutorily eligible establishments in any municipality with a 4population more than 2,000,000 people that applied for a video 5gaming license and any denied applicant had an opportunity to 6exhaust all administrative and judicial remedies; all eligible 7and licensed minority establishments in any municipality with 8a population more than 2,000,000 people has been authorized to 9commence gambling by the Board; and, following an audit by an 10independent auditor selected by the Task Force pursuant to the 11request for proposals process, issuance of a report by the 12auditor documenting that there is a majority of licensed 13establishments operated by a minority business enterprise 14terminal operator in any municipality with a population more 15than 2,000,000 people. 16    Section 10. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 17changing Sections 28-1 and 28-2 as follows: 18    (720 ILCS 5/28-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-1)19    Sec. 28-1. Gambling. 20    (a) A person commits gambling when he or she:21        (1) knowingly plays a game of chance or skill for 22    money or other thing of value, unless excepted in 23    subsection (b) of this Section;24        (2) knowingly makes a wager upon the result of any   HB3473- 8 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1    game, contest, or any political nomination, appointment or 2    election;3        (3) knowingly operates, keeps, owns, uses, purchases, 4    exhibits, rents, sells, bargains for the sale or lease of, 5    manufactures or distributes any gambling device;6        (4) contracts to have or give himself or herself or 7    another the option to buy or sell, or contracts to buy or 8    sell, at a future time, any grain or other commodity 9    whatsoever, or any stock or security of any company, where 10    it is at the time of making such contract intended by both 11    parties thereto that the contract to buy or sell, or the 12    option, whenever exercised, or the contract resulting 13    therefrom, shall be settled, not by the receipt or 14    delivery of such property, but by the payment only of 15    differences in prices thereof; however, the issuance, 16    purchase, sale, exercise, endorsement or guarantee, by or 17    through a person registered with the Secretary of State 18    pursuant to Section 8 of the Illinois Securities Law of 19    1953, or by or through a person exempt from such 20    registration under said Section 8, of a put, call, or 21    other option to buy or sell securities which have been 22    registered with the Secretary of State or which are exempt 23    from such registration under Section 3 of the Illinois 24    Securities Law of 1953 is not gambling within the meaning 25    of this paragraph (4);26        (5) knowingly owns or possesses any book, instrument   HB3473- 9 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1    or apparatus by means of which bets or wagers have been, or 2    are, recorded or registered, or knowingly possesses any 3    money which he has received in the course of a bet or 4    wager;5        (6) knowingly sells pools upon the result of any game 6    or contest of skill or chance, political nomination, 7    appointment or election;8        (7) knowingly sets up or promotes any lottery or 9    sells, offers to sell or transfers any ticket or share for 10    any lottery;11        (8) knowingly sets up or promotes any policy game or 12    sells, offers to sell or knowingly possesses or transfers 13    any policy ticket, slip, record, document or other similar 14    device;15        (9) knowingly drafts, prints or publishes any lottery 16    ticket or share, or any policy ticket, slip, record, 17    document or similar device, except for such activity 18    related to lotteries, bingo games and raffles authorized 19    by and conducted in accordance with the laws of Illinois 20    or any other state or foreign government;21        (10) knowingly advertises any lottery or policy game, 22    except for such activity related to lotteries, bingo games 23    and raffles authorized by and conducted in accordance with 24    the laws of Illinois or any other state;25        (11) knowingly transmits information as to wagers, 26    betting odds, or changes in betting odds by telephone,   HB3473- 10 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1    telegraph, radio, semaphore or similar means; or knowingly 2    installs or maintains equipment for the transmission or 3    receipt of such information; except that nothing in this 4    subdivision (11) prohibits transmission or receipt of such 5    information for use in news reporting of sporting events 6    or contests; or7        (12) knowingly establishes, maintains, or operates an 8    Internet site that permits a person to play a game of 9    chance or skill for money or other thing of value by means 10    of the Internet or to make a wager upon the result of any 11    game, contest, political nomination, appointment, or 12    election by means of the Internet. This item (12) does not 13    apply to activities referenced in items (6), (6.1), (8), 14    (8.1), and (15) of subsection (b) of this Section. 15    (b) Participants in any of the following activities shall 16not be convicted of gambling:17        (1) Agreements to compensate for loss caused by the 18    happening of chance including without limitation contracts 19    of indemnity or guaranty and life or health or accident 20    insurance.21        (2) Offers of prizes, award or compensation to the 22    actual contestants in any bona fide contest for the 23    determination of skill, speed, strength or endurance or to 24    the owners of animals or vehicles entered in such contest.25        (3) Pari-mutuel betting as authorized by the law of 26    this State.  HB3473- 11 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1        (4) Manufacture of gambling devices, including the 2    acquisition of essential parts therefor and the assembly 3    thereof, for transportation in interstate or foreign 4    commerce to any place outside this State when such 5    transportation is not prohibited by any applicable Federal 6    law; or the manufacture, distribution, or possession of 7    video gaming terminals, as defined in the Video Gaming 8    Act, by manufacturers, distributors, and terminal 9    operators licensed to do so under the Video Gaming Act.10        (5) The game commonly known as "bingo", when conducted 11    in accordance with the Bingo License and Tax Act.12        (6) Lotteries when conducted by the State of Illinois 13    in accordance with the Illinois Lottery Law. This 14    exemption includes any activity conducted by the 15    Department of Revenue to sell lottery tickets pursuant to 16    the provisions of the Illinois Lottery Law and its rules.17        (6.1) The purchase of lottery tickets through the 18    Internet for a lottery conducted by the State of Illinois 19    under the program established in Section 7.12 of the 20    Illinois Lottery Law. 21        (7) Possession of an antique slot machine that is 22    neither used nor intended to be used in the operation or 23    promotion of any unlawful gambling activity or enterprise. 24    For the purpose of this subparagraph (b)(7), an antique 25    slot machine is one manufactured 25 years ago or earlier.26        (8) Raffles and poker runs when conducted in   HB3473- 12 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1    accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs Act.2        (8.1) The purchase of raffle chances for a raffle 3    conducted in accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs 4    Act. 5        (9) Charitable games when conducted in accordance with 6    the Charitable Games Act.7        (10) Pull tabs and jar games when conducted under the 8    Illinois Pull Tabs and Jar Games Act.9        (11) Gambling games when authorized by the Illinois 10    Gambling Act.11        (12) Video gaming terminal games at a licensed 12    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 13    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 14    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment when 15    conducted in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 16        (13) Games of skill or chance where money or other 17    things of value can be won but no payment or purchase is 18    required to participate, except where participation in 19    such game of skill or chance is accomplished using a 20    gambling device prohibited by item (a)(iii) of Section 21    28-2. 22        (14) Savings promotion raffles authorized under 23    Section 5g of the Illinois Banking Act, Section 7008 of 24    the Savings Bank Act, Section 42.7 of the Illinois Credit 25    Union Act, Section 5136B of the National Bank Act (12 26    U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home Owners' Loan Act (12   HB3473- 13 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1    U.S.C. 1463). 2        (15) Sports wagering when conducted in accordance with 3    the Sports Wagering Act. 4    (c) Sentence.5        (1) Gambling is a Class A misdemeanor. A second or 6    subsequent conviction under subsections (a)(3) through 7    (a)(12), is a Class 4 felony.8        (2) Notwithstanding subsection (c)(1), or anything 9    else contained in this Section to the contrary, a gambling 10    offense involving a device described in item (a)(iii) 11    Section 28-2 is a Class 4 felony. 12    (d) Circumstantial evidence.13    In prosecutions under this Section circumstantial evidence 14shall have the same validity and weight as in any criminal 15prosecution.16(Source: P.A. 101-31, Article 25, Section 25-915, eff. 176-28-19; 101-31, Article 35, Section 35-80, eff. 6-28-19; 18101-109, eff. 7-19-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 19    (720 ILCS 5/28-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-2)20    Sec. 28-2. Definitions. 21    (a) A "gambling device" is (i) any clock, tape machine, 22slot machine or other machines or device for the reception of 23money or other thing of value on chance or skill or upon the 24action of which money or other thing of value is staked, 25hazarded, bet, won, or lost; (ii) or any mechanism, furniture,   HB3473- 14 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1fixture, equipment, or other device designed primarily for use 2in a gambling place; or (iii) any vending or other electronic 3machine or device, including, without limitation, a machine or 4device that awards credits and contains a circuit, meter, or 5switch capable of removing and recording the removal of 6credits or that is connected directly or indirectly to the 7Internet, either by cellular modem, hard wire, or wireless 8connection, or to a set of interconnected networked devices in 9order to participate in the game or contest or to receive or 10retrieve any data related to the device unless the connected 11device is a redemption vault; or does not operate with a 12self-contained fill system that permits the operation of the 13device solely determined on a fee basis or the amount of 14revenue generated but does not include a system based on time, 15number of spins or spin equivalent or other nonrevenue based 16system, and automatically ceases to operate upon the 17completion of a pre-determined cycle. A "gambling device" does 18not include:19        (1) A coin-in-the-slot operated mechanical device 20    played for amusement which rewards the player with the 21    right to replay such mechanical device, which device is so 22    constructed or devised as to make such result of the 23    operation thereof depend in part upon the skill of the 24    player and which returns to the player thereof no money, 25    property, or right to receive money or property.26        (2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a   HB3473- 15 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1    vending machine Vending machines by which full and 2    adequate return is made for the money invested and in 3    which there is no element of chance or hazard.4        (3) A crane game. For the purposes of this paragraph 5    (3), a "crane game" is an amusement device involving 6    skill, if it rewards the player exclusively with 7    merchandise contained within the amusement device proper 8    and limited to toys, novelties, and prizes other than 9    currency, each having a wholesale value which is not more 10    than $25.11        (4) A redemption machine. For the purposes of this 12    paragraph (4), a "redemption machine" is a single-player 13    or multi-player amusement device involving a game, the 14    object of which is throwing, rolling, bowling, shooting, 15    placing, or propelling a ball or other object that is 16    either physical or computer generated on a display or with 17    lights into, upon, or against a hole or other target that 18    is either physical or computer generated on a display or 19    with lights, or stopping, by physical, mechanical, or 20    electronic means, a moving object that is either physical 21    or computer generated on a display or with lights into, 22    upon, or against a hole or other target that is either 23    physical or computer generated on a display or with 24    lights, provided that all of the following conditions are 25    met:26            (A) The outcome of the game is predominantly   HB3473- 16 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1        determined by the skill of the player.2            (B) The award of the prize is based solely upon the 3        player's achieving the object of the game or otherwise 4        upon the player's score.5            (C) Only merchandise prizes are awarded.6            (D) The wholesale value of prizes awarded in lieu 7        of tickets or tokens for single play of the device does 8        not exceed $25.9            (E) The redemption value of tickets, tokens, and 10        other representations of value, which may be 11        accumulated by players to redeem prizes of greater 12        value, for a single play of the device does not exceed 13        $25.14        (5) Video gaming terminals at a licensed 15    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 16    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 17    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment licensed 18    in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 19    (a-5) "Internet" means an interactive computer service or 20system or an information service, system, or access software 21provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple 22users to a computer server, and includes, but is not limited 23to, an information service, system, or access software 24provider that provides access to a network system commonly 25known as the Internet, or any comparable system or service and 26also includes, but is not limited to, a World Wide Web page,   HB3473- 17 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1newsgroup, message board, mailing list, or chat area on any 2interactive computer service or system or other online 3service.4    (a-6) "Access" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 5Section 17-55.6    (a-7) "Computer" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 7Section 17-0.5. 8    (b) A "lottery" is any scheme or procedure whereby one or 9more prizes are distributed by chance among persons who have 10paid or promised consideration for a chance to win such 11prizes, whether such scheme or procedure is called a lottery, 12raffle, gift, sale, or some other name, excluding savings 13promotion raffles authorized under Section 5g of the Illinois 14Banking Act, Section 7008 of the Savings Bank Act, Section 1542.7 of the Illinois Credit Union Act, Section 5136B of the 16National Bank Act (12 U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home 17Owners' Loan Act (12 U.S.C. 1463).18    (c) A "policy game" is any scheme or procedure whereby a 19person promises or guarantees by any instrument, bill, 20certificate, writing, token, or other device that any 21particular number, character, ticket, or certificate shall in 22the event of any contingency in the nature of a lottery entitle 23the purchaser or holder to receive money, property, or 24evidence of debt.25(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-87, eff. 1-1-20; 26102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)   HB3473- 18 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.  HB3473- 19 -LRB104 08744 LNS 18798 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    230 ILCS 40/354    230 ILCS 40/76 new5    720 ILCS 5/28-1from Ch. 38, par. 28-16    720 ILCS 5/28-2from Ch. 38, par. 28-2